Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1214
Council; membership; holding other office or position; effect.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, membership on the council shall not disqualify any member from holding his or her office or position or cause the forfeiture thereof.

Laws 1980, LB 790, § 3.